New Jersey, session 221, A5700.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1) is amended to read as follows: 11. a. (1) No later than twelve months after the effective date of this section, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop and maintain a system for petitioners to electronically file expungement applications pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-1 et seq. The e-filing system shall be available Statewide and include electronic filing, electronic service of process, and electronic document management. (2)   The system shall, in accordance with N.J.S.2C:52-10, electronically notify and serve copies of the petition and all supporting documents upon the Superintendent of State Police, the Attorney General, and each county prosecutor as described in that section. (3)   The system shall electronically compile a listing of all possibly relevant Judiciary records for an expungement petitioner and transmit this information to all parties served with copies of the petition and all supporting documents in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection. b.    (1) Upon receipt of the information from the court pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection a. of this section, the Superintendent of State Police, the Attorney General, and the county prosecutor of any county in which the person was convicted shall, within 60 days, review and confirm, as appropriate, the information against the persons criminal history record information files and notify the court of any inaccurate or incomplete data contained in the information files, or of any other basis for ineligibility, if applicable, pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-14. (2) If, after 60 days, no objection is filed by the Superintendent of State Police, the Attorney General, or the county prosecutor, objections shall be deemed to be waived and the court shall consider the petition in accordance with N.J.S.2C:52-11 or N.J.S.2C:52-12 on the 61st day after the petition is filed.  If the 61st day falls on a weekend or a legal holiday, the court shall consider the petition on the next business day that is not a weekend or legal holiday. c.     The court shall provide copies of an expungement order to the person who is the subject of the petition and electronically transmit the order to the law enforcement and criminal justice agencies which, at the time of the hearing on the petition, possess any records specified in the order in accordance with N.J.S.2C:52-15. (cf: P.L.2019, c.269, s.11) 2. This act shall take effect immediately.